Missouri, session 2026, SB1140.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 537.046, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 537.046,
to read as follows:
537.046. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Childhood sexual abuse", any act committed by the
defendant, or an act committed by an individual if the
defendant's tortious conduct causes such act to occur,
against the plaintiff which act occurred when the plaintiff
was under the age of eighteen years and which act would have
been a violation of section 566.030, 566.031, 566.032,
566.034, 566.060, 566.061, 566.062, 566.064, 566.067,
566.068, 566.069, 566.071, 566.083, 566.086, 566.093,
566.095, 566.100, 566.101, 566.209, 566.210, 566.211,
568.020, or 573.200;
(2) "Injury" or "illness", either a physical injury or
illness or a psychological injury or illness. A
psychological injury or illness need not be accompanied by
physical injury or illness.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1140 2
2. Any action against any party to recover damages
from injury or illness caused by childhood sexual abuse or
tortious conduct that causes a victim to be a victim of
childhood sexual abuse in an action brought pursuant to this
section [shall be commenced within ten years of the
plaintiff attaining the age of twenty-one or within three
years of the date the plaintiff discovers, or reasonably
should have discovered, that the injury or illness was
caused by childhood sexual abuse, whichever later occurs]
may be commenced at any time.
3. This section shall apply to any action arising on
or after August 28, 2025.
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, a nondisclosure agreement by any party to a
childhood sexual abuse action shall not be judicially
enforceable in a dispute involving childhood sexual abuse
allegations or claims, and shall be void.
✓